apertium-sme-smj.sme.lexc
LEXICON ENDLEX
 @D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ;
! @D.Need3Part.ON@ # ; !3part
! This ENDLEX business in order to remove illegal compounds.
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ===== !
! Verbs !
! ===== !

! ToC
! ---

! Negative verbs
! Copula
! Stray forms+
! Main verbs

! -------------- !
! Negative verbs !
! -------------- !

LEXICON Negativeverb

ii+V+IV+Neg:0 negmood ;

LEXICON negmood
+Ind:0 negind ;
+Imprt:0 negimp ;
+Sup:0 negsup ;

LEXICON negind
+Sg1:%>in K ;
+Sg2:%>it K ;
+Sg3:%>ii K ;
+Du1:%>ean K ;
 +Du2+Use/Sub:eahkki%> K ; ! !Polmak dialect
+Du2:eahppi%> K ;
+Du3:eaba%> K ;
 +Du3+Use/Sub:eava%> K ; ! !Kárášjohka dialect
+Pl1:%>eat K ;
 +Pl1+Use/Sub:%>eap9 K ; ! !Skániid dialect
+Pl2:ehpe%>t K ;
+Pl3:%>eai K ;

LEXICON negimp
+Sg1:allo%>n K ;
+Sg2:ale%> K ;
+Sg3:allo%>s K ;
+Du1:al'lu%> K ;
+Du2:al'li%> K ;
+Du3:allo%>ska K ;
+Pl1:allo%>t K ;
+Pl2:alle%>t K ;
+Pl3:allo%>set K ;

LEXICON negsup
+Sg1:ama%>n K ;
+Sg2:ama%>t K ;
+Sg3:ama%>s K ;
+Du1:ama%>me K ;
+Du2:ama%>de K ;
+Du3:ama%>ska K ;
+Pl1:ama%>met K ;
+Pl2:ama%>det K ;
+Pl3:ama%>set K ;

! ------ !
! Copula !
! ------ !

LEXICON Copula ! Dividing into finite and infinite
leat+V+IV:l Finitecop ;
leat+V+IV:l Infinitecop ;

LEXICON Finitecop ! Removed %>, they blocked diphtsim^pl
+Ind+Prs:0 Prscop ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>eat K ;
+Ind+Prt:0 Prtcop ;
 +Cond+Prs:ivčče%> CondC ; ! regular cond, pointer to 3syll paradigm
 +Cond+Prs+Use/Sub:ivččo%> PrtV ;  ! alternate cond, pointer to 2syll par !
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3+Use/Sub:ivčče%> K ; ! special cond for Sg3 !
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%>eaš K ;    !  all Pot pointers copied from sme-lex
+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>eš K ; 
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:%>eaš K ; ! 
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>eš K ; 
+Pot+Prs:eažža%> PotPrsV ;
+Pot+Prt:eažža%> PrtV ;
+Imprt:0 Impcop ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:eage%> K ;
+Imprt+ConNegII:ehko%> K ;

! The boundary marks in the following 4 lexica were removed, as result of
! the discussion.
LEXICON Prscop
+Sg1:%>ean K ;
+Sg2:%>eat K ;
+Sg3:%>ea K ;
+Du1:etne%> K ;
 +Du1+Use/NG:edne%> K ; ! 
+Du2:eahppi%> K ;
+Du3:eaba%> K ;
+Pl1:%>eat K ;
+Pl2:ehpe%>t K ;
+Pl3:%>eat K ;

LEXICON Prtcop
+Sg1:edje%>n K ;
+Sg2:edje%>t K ;
+Sg3:%>ej K ;
 +Sg3+Use/NG:%>eaj K ; ! 
+Du1:ejmme%> K ;
+Du2:ejdde%> K ;
+Du3:ejgga%> K ;
 +Du3+Use/NG:eajgga%> K ; ! 
+Pl1:ejmme%>t K ;
+Pl2:ejdde%>t K ;
+Pl3:edje%> K ;

LEXICON Impcop
+Sg1:ehko%>n K ;
+Sg2:eage%> K ;
+Sg3:ehko%>s K ;
!+Sg3:%>eaj K ; !This is not right
 +Du1+Dial/%-KJ:eadnu%> K ; ! 
 +Du1+Dial/%-GG:eahkku%> K ;	! 
+Du2:eahkki%> K ;
+Du3:ehko%>ska K ;
 +Pl1+Dial/%-GG:ehko%>t K ;	! 
 +Pl1+Dial/%-KJ:eatno%>t K ; ! 
+Pl2:ehke%>t K ;
+Pl3:ehko%>set K ;

LEXICON Infinitecop
 +Inf+Use/NG:eahki%>t K ; ! 
 +Inf+Use/Sub:eahke%>t K ; !
+Inf:%>eat K ;
+Actio:eahki%>n K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Dial/%-GG:eame%>n K ;	! 
 +Actio+Ess+Dial/%-KJ:eame%> K ;		! 
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:eahki%>me K ;		! 
+Actio+Loc:eame%>s K ;
 +PrfPrc+Use/NG:%>ean K ; ! 
+PrfPrc:eama%>š K ;
 +PrfPrc+Use/NG:eama%>šan K ; ! 

! ----------- !
! Stray forms !
! ----------- !

LEXICON STRAYFORMS

 sorjankeahttá+V+IV+Abess:sorjan%>keahttá # ; ! Abess without verb.

! These forms added for the dictionary:

huraidit+V+IV+VGen:hurat K ;
huraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:hurat K ;
huraidit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2:hurat K ;
háliidit+V+TV+VGen:hálit K ;
háliidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:hálit K ;
háliidit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2:hálit K ;

! ---------- !
! Main verbs !
! ---------- !

LEXICON NounSecond
! some stray affixes, look at these
! Trying them without the initial hyphen
 bea0lis+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:beallis LASIS ; !
 čor0gi+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:čor'gi GOAHTI ; !
 giel+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:giel At; !
 miese#beas0ka+CmpN/Last:miese#beas'ka GOAHTI ; !
 nammasaš+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:nammas AHKASAS ; !
 niehkki+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only:niehkki AIGI ; !
 sahán+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only:sahám BOAHTIN ; !
sis#muotkun:sis#muotkum BOAHTIN ;
!čiegahas:čiegahass JOHTOLAT ; !Especially with numerals, moved to LEXICON SAS

! Yes, this is what they used to look like.
! We remove these obsolete ones if we like the hyphenless ones.
!-bea0lis:-beallis LASIS ;
!-čor0gi:-čor'gi GOAHTI ;
!-giel At ;
!-miese#beas0ka:-miese#beas'ka GOAHTI ;
!-nammasaš:-nammasažž JOHTOLAT ;
!-niehkki:-niehkki AIGI ;
!-sahán:-sahám BOAHTIN ; !+CmpN/Sg +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
!-sis#muotkun:-sis#muotkum BOAHTIN ; !+CmpN/Sg +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft


!LEXICON NOUNONLYAFTERNUMBER
!čiegahas:čiegahass JOHTOLAT ;

!LEXICON NOUNALSOAFTERNUMBER
!# ;

! bahá: Seamma subst ferte lea guokte geardde. Čiegahas ii gávdno okto.
! molssueaktu: Vqldit miellahtutut eret NounRoot:as, ja geavahit 121.

LEXICON LEXATTR  ! This lexicon is here to give the tags to the compounding
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ; ! attributive forms.

LEXICON At !NB Have commented out everything except K ; here to avoid strange
           ! compounds like -šlailágán etc. Attr. that can be compounded with
           ! NAMAT etc are redirected to LEXATTR
+A+Attr:%> K ;
+A+Attr:%>%- RAbbr ;
!+A+Attr-:#%- ProperNoun ;   ! Compounds
!+A+Attr:# AGADJECT ;
!+A+Attr+lágan:lágan LAGAN ; ! Derivation !tentative !
!+A+Attr:# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj
!+A+Attr:# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj !^C^


LEXICON FINJU- !compounds only
+A+Attr:%> Rreal ; 
+A+Attr:» NAMAT ;



LEXICON ALIT 								   !^C^
! Both second-part compound and independent adj!^C^
! čáhppesalit bábir							   !^C^
! alit bábir								   !^C^
 alit+Use/Circ:alih BEAKKAN ;   ! blue				   !
 ruoksat+Use/Circ:ruoks VIELG ; ! red					   !
 háváš+Use/Circ:háváž BEAKKAN ; ! -times				   !
 stábat+Use/Circ:stábag AGAdj ; !						   !

LEXICON VerbRoot
ii+V+IV+Neg:0 negmood ;
leat+V+IV:l Finitecop ;
leat+V+IV:l Infinitecop ;
LEXICON NounRoot
 giel+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:giel At; !
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
albma LEXATTR ;
árrat:árra LEXATTR ;
 bahá LEXATTR ;  ! This one is for "bahá vuoiŋŋat"
beaivásaš At ;
boahtte At ;
cakkas LEXATTR ;
 čoaskkis:čoaskkes LEXATTR ; ! takes care of irregular attr form
 čorgat+Use/Sub:čorgis LEXATTR ; !
čorgat:čorges LEXATTR ;
dalá LEXATTR ;
dálá LEXATTR ;
dá0mis:dámisis LEXATTR ;
eambbo At ;
eanas At ;
eanaš At ;
fásta LEXATTR ;
gahperahtes LEXATTR ;
 galljes+Use/Sub:galljes LEXATTR; ! !This is the Attr. used for gallji
gápmagahtes LEXATTR ;
 gie0ris:gieres LEXATTR ; !Irregular attr form
goappašat LEXATTR ;
goassáš At ;
ihttáš LEXATTR ;
 liige FINJU- ;
 lossat:los'ses LEXATTR ; ! ad hoc exceptional form
 moju FINJU- ;
 molssu FINJU- ;
nissonahtes LEXATTR ;
 nu#gohčoduvvon+Use/Sub:nu#gohčoduvvon At; !
 nubbe+Use/Sub:nubbe LEXATTR; !
oppa At ;
ráhpat:ráhpa LEXATTR ;
 ráttas LEXATTR ; ! irregular attr.form
 rávddis:rávddisis LEXATTR ; !alternating is-attr
riekta:rivttes LEXATTR ;
sáme#giel At ;
 seaggi:seakkes LEXATTR ;  !irregular attr. form
sierra LEXATTR ;
 stuoris+Dial/%-GG:stuorra LEXATTR ; ! takes care of irregular attr form 
suohkat:suhkkes LEXATTR ;
 unni:una LEXATTR ; ! attr una
unnis LEXATTR ;
